Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 1 General Provisions

37-4-1.
Declaration of policy.

The State of Georgia recognizes the capacity of all of its citizens, including those who are developmentally disabled, to be both personally and socially productive; and it further recognizes its obligation to provide aid in the form of a coordinated
system of community facilities, programs, and services to developmentally disabled citizens so that they may achieve a greater measure of independence and fulfillment and more fully enjoy their rights of citizenship.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2501, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-4-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Client” means any person with a developmental disability who seeks habilitation under this chapter or any person for whom such habilitation is sought.

“Clinical record” means a written record pertaining to an individual client and includes habilitation record, progress notes, charts, admission and discharge data, and all other information which is recorded by a facility and which pertains to the client’s
habilitation. Such other information as may be required by rules and regulations of the board shall also be included.

“Community services” means all services deemed reasonably necessary by the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities to provide for the education, training, habilitation, and care of developmentally disabled individuals. Such services
shall include, but not be limited to, diagnostic and evaluation services, day-care and training services, work activity services, community residential services such as group family care homes, transportation services, social services,
medical services, and specified home services.

“Comprehensive habilitation team” means and shall consist of a group of persons with special training and experience in the assessment of needs and provision of services for developmentally disabled persons. The group shall include, at a minimum, persons
qualified to provide social, psychological, medical, and other services. The department shall specify the qualifications of the individuals who comprise a comprehensive habilitation team and shall ensure that such teams are located
throughout the state so as to provide diagnostic, evaluation, and habilitation services for all citizens of Georgia.

“Court” means:

In the case of an individual who is 17 years of age or older, the probate court of the county of residence of the client or the county in which such client is found. Notwithstanding Code Section 15-9-13, in any case in which the judge of said probate
court is unable to hear a case brought under this chapter within the time required for such hearing, said judge shall appoint a person to serve and exercise all the jurisdiction of the probate court in such case. Any person
so appointed shall be a member of the State Bar of Georgia and shall be otherwise qualified for his or her duties by training and experience. Such appointment may be made on a case-by-case basis or by making a standing
appointment of one or more persons. Any person receiving such standing appointment shall serve at the pleasure of the judge making the appointment or the judge’s successor in office to hear such cases if and when necessary.
The compensation of a person so appointed shall be as agreed upon by the judge who makes the appointment and the person appointed with the approval of the governing authority of the county for which such person is appointed
and shall be paid from the county funds of said county. All fees collected for the services of such appointed person shall be paid into the general funds of the county served; or

In the case of an individual who is under the age of 17 years, the juvenile court of the county of residence of the client or the county in which such client is found.

“Facility” means any state owned or state operated institution utilized 24 hours a day for the habilitation and residence of persons who are developmentally disabled, any facility operated or utilized for such purpose by the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs or any other federal agency, and any other facility within the State of Georgia approved for such purpose by the department.

“Full and fair hearing” or “hearing” means a proceeding before an administrative law judge, under Code Section 37-4-42, or before a court, as defined in paragraph (5) of this Code section. The hearing may be held in a regular courtroom or in an informal
setting, in the discretion of the administrative law judge or the court, but the hearing shall be recorded electronically or by a qualified court reporter. The client shall be provided with effective assistance of counsel. If the
client cannot afford counsel, the court shall appoint counsel for him or her or the administrative law judge shall have the court appoint such counsel. The client shall have the right to confront and cross-examine witnesses and
to offer evidence. The client shall have the right to subpoena witnesses and to require testimony before the administrative law judge or in court in person or by deposition from any physician upon whose evaluation the decision
of the administrative law judge or the court may rest. The client shall have the right to obtain a continuance for any reasonable time for good cause shown. The administrative law judge and the court shall apply the rules of evidence
applicable in civil cases. The burden of proof shall be upon the party seeking treatment of the client. The standard of proof shall be by clear and convincing evidence. At the request of the client, the public may be excluded from
the hearing, and the client need not be present if the court consents; in either of these events, the record shall reflect the reason for the administrative law judge’s or the court’s action.

“Habilitation” means the process by which program personnel help clients acquire and maintain those life skills which will enable them to cope more effectively with the demands of their own persons and of their environment and to raise the level of their
physical, mental, social, and vocational abilities.

“Individualized program plan” means a proposed habilitation program written in behavioral terms, developed by the comprehensive habilitation team, and specifically tailored to the needs of an individual client. Each plan shall include:

A statement of the nature of the client’s specific problems and specific needs;

A description of intermediate and long-range habilitation goals and a projected timetable for their attainment;

A description of the proposed habilitation program and its relation to habilitation goals;

Identification of the facility and types of professional personnel responsible for execution of the client’s habilitation program;

A statement of the least restrictive environment necessary to achieve the purposes of habilitation, based upon the needs of the client;

An explanation of criteria for acceptance or rejection of alternative environments for habilitation; and

Proposed criteria for release of the client into less restrictive habilitation environments upon obtaining specified habilitation goals.

“Least restrictive alternative,” “least restrictive environment,” or “least restrictive appropriate habilitation” means that which is the least restrictive available alternative, environment, or appropriate habilitation, as applicable, within the limits
of state funds specifically appropriated therefor.

“Person in charge of a client’s habilitation” means a superintendent or regional state hospital administrator of a facility, a case manager, or any other service provider designated by the department to have overall responsibility for implementation of
a client’s individualized program plan. The department shall designate such a person for each individual ordered to receive services from the department under this chapter.

“Representatives” means the persons appointed as provided in Code Section 37-4-107 to receive any notice under this chapter.

“Superintendent” means the chief administrative officer who has overall management responsibility at any facility, other than a regional state hospital or state owned or operated community program, receiving developmentally disabled persons under this
chapter or an individual appointed as the designee of such superintendent.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2502, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2503.12, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 734, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1092,
§ 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 37; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-12; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-13/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 1/HB 324.

37-4-3.
Authority of board to issue regulations; powers of department generally.

The board shall issue regulations to implement this chapter in accordance with the intent of this chapter to safeguard the rights of developmentally disabled persons.

In addition to the other powers provided by this chapter, the department shall have the authority:

To enforce the regulations issued by the board;

To prescribe the forms of applications, records, medical certificates, and any other forms required or used under this chapter and the information required to be contained therein;

To require such reports from any facility as it may find necessary to the performance of its duties or functions;

To visit facilities regularly to review the procedures applied to all clients;

To determine the care, treatment, education, habilitation, or other specialized services being given all clients;

To investigate complaints and make reports and recommendations relative to the same; and

To make effective such procedures and orders as may be appropriate to carry out this chapter.

Notwithstanding the powers granted to the department under this Code section, the requirements of this Code section as to determination of care, treatment, education, habilitation, or other specialized services of clients and the investigation of complaints
shall not apply to clients who are being cared for in a facility operated by or under the control of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other federal agency.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2511, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2509.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-4-4.
Coordination of training programs for the developmentally disabled.

The State Department of Education is authorized and directed to coordinate its program for training the developmentally disabled with the programs of the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities. The Department of Education is authorized
and empowered to expend funds appropriated to or available to it for such purposes.

History.
Ga. L. 1963, p. 259, § 5; Ga. L. 1966, p. 374, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 3-2, 3-5/HB 228.

37-4-5.
Validity of hospitalization orders entered before September 1, 1978; establishment of regulations authorizing continued care for clients receiving services pursuant to orders entered before September 1, 1978; validity of hospitalization orders entered before July 1, 2011.

No hospitalization of a developmentally disabled person lawful before September 1, 1978, shall be deemed unlawful because of the enactment of this chapter. The board is authorized to establish reasonable regulations to require that the superintendent
or regional state hospital administrator of each facility where developmentally disabled persons are in residence apply under Code Section 37-4-42 for an order authorizing continued care of a client for whom such care is necessary
and who was initially hospitalized under an order of a court prior to September 1, 1978. Such prior orders of hospitalization entered by the courts, unless superseded at an earlier date by an order under this chapter, or unless
such prior orders expire under their own terms at an earlier date, shall remain valid until 12 months following September 1, 1978, after which all such orders shall be null and void and of no effect.

No hospitalization of a person with developmental disabilities which was lawful before July 1, 2011, shall be deemed unlawful because of the repeal of former Code sections under Article 2 of this chapter.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2509.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-19; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 337, § 2/HB 324.

37-4-6.
Immunity from liability for actions taken in good faith compliance with admission and discharge provisions of chapter.

Any physician, psychologist, peace officer, attorney, or health official or any hospital official, agent, or other person employed by a private hospital or at a facility operated by the state, by a political subdivision of the state, or by a hospital
authority created pursuant to the “Hospital Authorities Law,” Article 4 of Chapter 7 of Title 31 who acts in good faith in compliance with the admission and discharge provisions of this chapter shall be immune from civil or criminal
liability for his actions in connection with the admission of a client to a facility or the discharge of a client from a facility.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.23, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 24.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 121 (1992).

37-4-7.
Apprehension by peace officer of developmentally disabled person who leaves facility without permission.

If, during the period of habilitation authorized by this chapter a client escapes or otherwise leaves a facility without permission, the facility may advise any peace officer that the client has escaped or otherwise left the facility without permission;
and the peace officer shall be authorized to take said client into custody and return him to such facility.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2509.9, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 734, § 8.

37-4-8.
Approval of private facilities; powers and duties of private facilities; right to deny admission.

Any private facility within this state may be approved as a facility for the habilitation of developmentally disabled persons by the department at the request of or with the consent of the governing officers of such private facility. When so approved,
the private facility shall have all powers given to the corresponding type of facility under this chapter for evaluation and habilitation and shall have all duties and obligations of such facilities imposed by this chapter, except
that any such private facility may decline to accept any client who is unable to pay it for habilitation services or for whom it has no available space.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2509.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.